test/src/morphology/N-море_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - море M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      море+N+Neu+Sg+Nom: мо́ре
      море+N+Neu+Sg+Acc: мо́ре
      море+N+Neu+Sg+Gen: мо́ря
      море+N+Neu+Sg+Loc: мо́ре
      море+N+Neu+Sg+Dat: мо́рю
      море+N+Neu+Sg+Ins: мо́рем
      море+N+Neu+Pl+Nom: моря́
      море+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Inan: моря́
      море+N+Neu+Pl+Gen: море́й
      море+N+Neu+Pl+Loc: моря́х
      море+N+Neu+Pl+Dat: моря́м
      море+N+Neu+Pl+Ins: моря́ми
